Tennessee, session 114, SB0422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-10-314(b), is amended by
deleting "three (3) years" and substituting "two (2) years".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0422
002342
- 1 -